Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVIII Witnesses, Evidence, Notaries, Commissioners of Foreign Deeds, and Legal Notices
CHAPTER 421 Witnesses

421.010.
Fees of witnesses generally. [Repealed.]

421.015.
Mileage allowance for witnesses in Circuit and District Courts.

A witness who resides in a county other than that to which he is subpoenaed shall be allowed the same amount allowed state employees under KRS

44.060

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 45, § 1, effective January 1, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

44.020

applies to this section which pertains to a mileage allowance for Kentucky witnesses in circuit and district courts.

OAG 81-336

.

Subsection (2) of KRS

421.250

is impliedly repealed by this section as relates to the mileage factor.

OAG 82-620

.

This section is broad enough to encompass nonresident, as well as resident, witnesses in felony cases as to the mileage factor where privately owned conveyance is used.

OAG 82-620

.

Regarding mileage fee for nonresident witness in a felony case, this section, KRS

421.030

and 421.250(2) must be read together under the doctrine of in pari materia. Thus a nonresident witness, residing in a state which has adopted the Uniform Witness Act, and who is certified as a material witness for a Kentucky court felony case, is entitled to the mileage of 18 cents per mile where a privately owned vehicle is used or where the witness elects to travel by some other means, including air, except that the 18 cents per mile payment cannot exceed airplane coach fare; in addition, under KRS 421.250(2), such witness is entitled to the $5.00 per diem and under KRS

421.030

, such witness is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable lodging, food, tolls and taxi fares.

OAG 82-620

.

Notwithstanding the ordinary level of reimbursement of travel expenses to be afforded nonresident material witnesses in felony cases, the Commonwealth must pay, as part of the necessary expenses of a witness, that amount required by the law of another state (one adopting the Uniform Witness Act) to be tendered in advance to a nonresident witness, as a prerequisite to issuance of its subpoena requiring a witness to travel to and give testimony in Kentucky.

OAG 82-620

.

While this section refers narrowly to a mileage allowance for witnesses in court, under the doctrine of in pari materia, i.e., reading the related statutes together, witnesses who must travel to another county for appearance in circuit court would be entitled to the mileage allowance given state employees, and would be entitled to reimbursement for their necessary food and lodging costs as authorized in KRS

44.060

,

45.101

,

45.180

(repealed) and this section.

OAG 83-117

.

Former employees of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, including the Office of the State Medical Examiner and of the Kentucky State Police Laboratory, are not entitled under Kentucky law to hourly compensation when subpoenaed to testify in a case arising from their duties while employed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

OAG 2009-005

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Witnesses, § 55.00.

421.020.
Fees allowed Commonwealth’s witnesses in felony cases. [Repealed.]

421.030.
Nonresident witness — When expenses allowed.

A Commonwealth’s witness in a felony case who resides in another state shall be allowed his necessary expenses in addition to the per diem, but no such allowance shall be made unless the judge of the court has made an order based upon the personal knowledge of the Circuit Judge or upon information showing that the testimony of the witness is material to the state, requiring the attendance of the witness. The expense and per diem shall be allowed by the Circuit Court and certified to the circuit clerk for payment.

History.

368: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2; 1964, ch. 177, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

44.020

applies to this section which relates to nonresident prosecutorial witness expenses in felony cases.

OAG 81-336

.

Regarding mileage fee for a nonresident witness in a felony case, this section, KRS

421.015

and 421.250(2) must be read together under the doctrine of pari materia. Thus a nonresident witness, residing in a state which has adopted the Uniform Witness Act, and who is certified as a material witness for a Kentucky court felony case, is entitled to the mileage of 18 cents per mile where a privately owned vehicle is used, or where the witness elects to travel by some other means, including air, except that the 18 cents per mile payment cannot exceed airplane coach fare; in addition, under KRS 421.250(2), such witness is entitled to the $5.00 per diem and under this section, such witness is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable lodging, food, tolls and taxifares.

OAG 82-620

.

Notwithstanding the ordinary level of reimbursement of travel expenses to be afforded nonresident material witnesses in felony cases, the Commonwealth must pay, as part of the necessary expenses of a witness, that amount required by the law of another state (one adopting the Uniform Witness Act) to be tendered in advance to a nonresident witness, as a prerequisite to issuance of its subpoena requiring a witness to travel to and give testimony in Kentucky.

OAG 82-620

.

Former employees of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, including the Office of the State Medical Examiner and of the Kentucky State Police Laboratory, are not entitled under Kentucky law to hourly compensation when subpoenaed to testify in a case arising from their duties while employed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

OAG 2009-005

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Certificate of Circuit Clerk that Witness has Attended on Felony Case, Form 55.05.

421.040.
Fee in felony case must be claimed — When not allowed.

Each witness for the Commonwealth in a felony case shall, immediately after he testifies claim his attendance in open court. The claim may be allowed by the court and if it is allowed it shall be noted of record. Any person who has been subpoenaed or recognized as a witness in a felony case who fails to appear upon the calling of the case, is not entitled to claim as a witness in that case unless he files an affidavit from which it appears that he had a good excuse for failing to attend. When the affidavit is filed the court may allow the witness to claim his attendance. The clerk shall note on his order book the name of each witness who fails to attend the first day of the trial.

History.

1737, 1738.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Affidavit of Witness to Claim Attendance, Form 55.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Certificate of Circuit Clerk that Witness has Attended on Felony Case, Form 55.05.

421.045.
Clerk to pay witnesses — State to provide funds — Clerk’s fee. [Repealed.]

421.050.
State prosecutions in federal courts — Fees of witnesses and officers in.

In all criminal or penal actions that are removed from any court of this state to a federal court, the officers of the federal court and the witnesses who are subpoenaed and attend such court in behalf of the state are entitled to the same fees, per diem and mileage allowed under United States statutes to such officers and witnesses for similar services in similar cases when subpoenaed by and for the United States. Such fees, per diem and mileage shall be paid by the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon presentation of the certificate of the clerk of the federal court, approved by the judge thereof. The certificate shall show the amount due each officer and witness.

History.

1738a.

421.060.
Witness can only claim in one (1) case.

A witness attending several suits at the same time can only claim in one (1) case.

History.

1735.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Witnesses, § 55.00.

421.070.
Liability for attachment and nonappearance.

When a witness is attached he shall pay the costs of the attachment, unless it appears from evidence he was not in fault. When a witness who has been duly subpoenaed fails without a good excuse, to appear on the trial, he shall pay all costs resulting from his failure.

History.

888.

421.080.
Evading process prohibited.

No person shall leave this state or avoid service of process by any means whatever, so as to avoid being compelled to testify before any legislative committee or grand jury.

No person shall procure the absence of a witness for the purpose set out in subsection (1).

History.

4866a-1, 4866a-2.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a business operator refuses to permit the constable or deputy to serve process peaceably upon one or more of his employees at his place of business, he could be in violation of this section, where the process is designed to compel the attendance of the witness before the grand jury or legislative committee.

OAG 83-493

.

421.090.
Disqualification because of conviction. [Repealed.]

421.100.
Newspaper, radio or television broadcasting station personnel need not disclose source of information.

No person shall be compelled to disclose in any legal proceeding or trial before any court, or before any grand or petit jury, or before the presiding officer of any tribunal, or his agent or agents, or before the General Assembly, or any committee thereof, or before any city or county legislative body, or any committee thereof, or elsewhere, the source of any information procured or obtained by him, and published in a newspaper or by a radio or television broadcasting station by which he is engaged or employed, or with which he is connected.

History.

1649d-1: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 121.

421.110.
Punishment of witness for contempt.

Disobedience of a subpoena; intentional evasion of a service of it, by concealment, or otherwise; concealment or removal of a minor to prevent service of a subpoena upon him, or preventing his attendance as a witness, by a person having control of him; or a refusal to be sworn or to answer as a witness, or to subscribe an affidavit or deposition when lawfully ordered, may be punished as a contempt of the court or officer by whom the attendance or testimony of the witness is required.

History.

C. C. 535: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

421.120.
Liability of disobedient witness for costs and damages.

When a witness is brought before a court for contempt by disobedience of a subpoena, and it is shown that the legal fees for travel and one (1) day’s attendance were paid or tendered to him when the subpoena was served, and that he failed to attend without reasonable cause, the court may summarily order him to pay the party, on whose behalf he was summoned, the costs occasioned to him by the disobedience of the subpoena, not exceeding twenty dollars ($20); and he shall also be liable for any damages occasioned by the failure to attend.

History.

C. C. 536: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

421.130.
Warrant of arrest of disobedient witness — Bond.

If a witness fail to attend in obedience to a subpoena, the court or officer before whom his attendance was required may issue a warrant for arresting and bringing him before the court or officer, at a time and place to be fixed in the warrant, to give his testimony, and answer for the contempt. If the warrant be not for immediately bringing the witness before the court or officer, a sum shall be fixed in which the witness may give bond, with surety, for his appearance; and if no sum be fixed by the court or officer, it shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

C. C. 537: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

421.135.
Special bailiff to compel attendance of witness in felony case.

When a felony case has been called, and either party is not ready for trial because a witness who has been duly subpoenaed and has failed to appear is not in the county in which the court is sitting, the Circuit Judge may appoint a special bailiff, who shall have power to arrest and bring the witness immediately before the court. The bailiff shall be allowed by the judge a reasonable compensation for the service, not to exceed that allowed to sheriffs for conveying prisoners to the penitentiary.

History.

1142: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 62.

421.140.
Refusal of witness to testify — Imprisonment.

If a witness refuses to testify, or to be sworn, or to give a deposition, he shall be imprisoned so long as he refuses, or until he testifies before an officer who is authorized to take his testimony. The final disposition of the case in which he so refuses shall discharge him from imprisonment.

History.

C.C. 538: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 423, effective January 2, 1978.

421.150.
Form of warrant of commitment or arrest.

Every warrant of commitment to prison issued by a court or officer, pursuant to KRS

421.110

to

421.180

, must specify particularly the cause of the commitment; and, if it be for refusing to answer a question, such question must be stated in the warrant. And every warrant to arrest or commit a witness must be directed to the sheriff of the county where he may be, and be executed in the same manner as process from the court.

History.

C. C. 539: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Warrant of Arrest Against Witnesses for Contempt, Form 22.06.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Warrant of Arrest of Witness for Disobeying Subpoena, Form 54.10.

421.160.
Oral examination of prisoners — Depositions. [Repealed.]

421.170.
Control of prisoners during taking of deposition. [Repealed.]

421.180.
Immunity of witness from suit.

A witness shall not be liable to be sued in a county in which he does not reside, by being served with a summons in such county while going, returning or attending, in obedience to a subpoena.

History.

C. C. 542: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

421.190.
Person present may be compelled to testify.

A person present before a court or before a judicial officer may be compelled to testify in the same manner as if he were served with a subpoena.

History.

C. C. 602: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

421.200.
Competency of witnesses generally. [Repealed.]

421.210.
Person not to testify in his own behalf — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

421.215.
Psychiatrist-patient privilege — Limitations. [Repealed.]

421.2151.
Privileged communication between sexual assault counselor and victim. [Repealed.]

421.216.
School counselor-student counselee communications — Immunity from disclosure. [Repealed.]

421.220.
Other objections to witnesses go to credit. [Repealed.]

421.225.
Testimony of defendant.

In any criminal or penal prosecution the defendant, on his own request, shall be allowed to testify in his own behalf, but his failure to do so shall not be commented upon or create any presumption against him.

History.

1645, 1646: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 1, § 1.

421.230.
Definitions for KRS 421.230 to 421.270.

The word “witness” as used in KRS

421.230

to

421.270

shall include a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution or proceeding.

The word “state” shall include any territory of the United States and District of Columbia.

The word “summons” shall include a subpoena, order or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 132, § 1, effective June 19, 1952.

421.240.
Procedure for compelling attendance as witnesses in other states of persons in this state — Custody — Disobedience of summons.

If a judge of a court of record in any state which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within that state to attend and testify in this state certifies under the seal of such court that there is a criminal prosecution pending in such court, or that a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence, that a person being within this state is a material witness in such prosecution, or grand jury investigation, and that his presence will be required for a specified number of days, upon presentation of such certificate to any judge of a court of record in the county in which such person is, such judge shall fix a time and place for a hearing, and shall make an order directing the witness to appear at a time and place certain for the hearing.

If at a hearing the judge determines that the witness is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution or a grand jury investigation in the other state, and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending, or grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence (and of any other state through which the witness may be required to pass by ordinary course of travel), will give to him protection from arrest and the service of civil and criminal process, he shall issue a summons, with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending, or where a grand jury investigation has commenced or is about to commence at a time and place specified in the summons. In any such hearing the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of all the facts stated therein.

If said certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state to assure his attendance in the requesting state, such judge may, in lieu of notification of the hearing, direct that such witness be forthwith brought before him for said hearing; and the judge at the hearing being satisfied of the desirability of such custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof of such desirability may, in lieu of issuing subpoena or summons, order that said witness be forthwith taken into custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state.

If the witness, who is summoned as above provided, after being paid or tendered by some properly authorized person the sum of ten cents ($0.10) a mile for each mile by the ordinary traveled route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending and five dollars ($5) for each day, that he is required to travel and attend as a witness, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 132, § 2, effective June 19, 1952.

421.250.
Procedure for procuring attendance as witnesses in this state of persons in other states.

If a person in any state, which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions, or grand jury investigations commenced or about to commence, in this state, is a material witness in a prosecution pending in a court of record in this state, or in a grand jury investigation which has commenced or is about to commence, a judge of such court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. Said certificate may include a recommendation that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of this state to assure his attendance in this state. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county in which the witness is found.

If the witness is summoned to attend and testify in this state he shall be tendered the sum of ten cents ($0.10) a mile for each mile by the ordinary traveled route to and from the court where the prosecution is pending, and five dollars ($5) for each day that he is required to travel and attend as a witness, same to be paid in manner that other witnesses are paid by the Commonwealth of Kentucky. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the summons shall not be required to remain within this state a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If such witness, after coming into this state, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the summons, he shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a summons issued from a court of record in this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 132, § 3, effective June 19, 1952.

421.260.
Immunity of witnesses of other states from arrest or service of civil and criminal process.

If a person comes into this state in obedience to a summons directing him to attend and testify in this state he shall not while in this state pursuant to such summons be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

If a person passes through this state while going to another state in obedience to a summons to attend and testify in that state or while returning therefrom, he shall not while so passing through this state be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this state under the summons.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 132, § 4, effective June 19, 1952.

421.270.
Citation of KRS 421.230 to 421.270.

KRS

421.230

to

421.270

may be cited as “Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from Within or Without a State in Criminal Proceedings.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 132, § 5, effective June 19, 1952.

421.350.
Testimony of child allegedly victim of illegal sexual activity.

This section applies only to a proceeding in the prosecution of an offense, including but not limited to an offense under KRS

510.040

to

510.155

,

529.030

to

529.050

,

529.070

,

529.100

,

529.110

,

530.020

,

530.060

, 530.064(1)(a),

531.310

,

531.320

,

531.370

, or any specified in KRS

439.3401

and all dependency proceedings pursuant to KRS Chapter 620, when the act is alleged to have been committed against a child twelve (12) years of age or younger, and applies to the statements or testimony of that child or another child who is twelve (12) years of age or younger who witnesses one of the offenses included in this subsection.

The court may, on the motion of the attorney for any party and upon a finding of compelling need, order that the testimony of the child be taken in a room other than the courtroom and be televised by closed circuit equipment in the courtroom to be viewed by the court and the finder of fact in the proceeding. Only the attorneys for the defendant and for the state, persons necessary to operate the equipment, and any person whose presence the court finds would contribute to the welfare and well-being of the child may be present in the room with the child during his testimony. Only the attorneys may question the child. The persons operating the equipment shall be confined to an adjacent room or behind a screen or mirror that permits them to see and hear the child during his testimony, but does not permit the child to see or hear them. The court shall permit the defendant to observe and hear the testimony of the child in person, but shall ensure that the child cannot hear or see the defendant.

The court may, on the motion of the attorney for any party and upon a finding of compelling need, order that the testimony of the child be taken outside the courtroom and be recorded for showing in the courtroom before the court and the finder of fact in the proceeding. Only those persons permitted to be present at the taking of testimony under subsection (3) of this section may be present during the taking of the child’s testimony, and the persons operating the equipment shall be confined from the child’s sight and hearing as provided by subsection (3) of this section. The court shall permit the defendant to observe and hear the testimony of the child in person, but shall ensure that the child cannot hear or see the defendant. The court shall also ensure that:

The recording is both visual and oral and is recorded on film or videotape or by other electronic means;

The recording equipment was capable of making an accurate recording, the operator was competent, and the recording is accurate and is not altered;

Each voice on the recording is identified; and

Each party is afforded an opportunity to view the recording before it is shown in the courtroom.

If the court orders the testimony of a child to be taken under subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the child may not be required to testify in court at the proceeding for which the testimony was taken, but shall be subject to being recalled during the course of the trial to give additional testimony under the same circumstances as with any other recalled witness, provided that the additional testimony is given utilizing the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

For the purpose of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, “compelling need” is defined as the substantial probability that the child would be unable to reasonably communicate because of serious emotional distress produced by the defendant’s presence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 19, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 439, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2006, ch. 182, § 63, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 19, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 25, § 21, effective June 25, 2013.

421.355.
Admissibility of victim’s out-of-court statements. [Repealed.]

421.360.
Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.

This section may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.

As used in this section:

“Foreign jurisdiction” means a state other than this state;

“Foreign subpoena” means a subpoena issued under authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States; and

“Subpoena” means a document, however denominated, issued under authority of a court of record requiring a person to:

Attend and give testimony at a deposition;

Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or

Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.

To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party shall submit a foreign subpoena to the clerk of the Circuit Court of the county in which discovery is sought to be conducted in this state. A request for the issuance of a subpoena under this section does not constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.

When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of the Circuit Court in this state, the clerk, in accordance with that court’s procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed.

A subpoena under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall:

Incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena; and

Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel.

A subpoena issued by a clerk of the Circuit Court under subsection (3) of this section shall be served in compliance with any rule of court or statute relating to the service of a subpoena issued in this state.

Rules of court and any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes applicable to compliance with subpoenas to attend and give testimony; produce designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things; or permit inspection of premises shall apply to subpoenas issued under subsection (3) of this section.

An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of the Circuit Court under subsection (3) of this section shall comply with the rules of court of this state and statutes of this state and be submitted to the Circuit Court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

This section applies to requests for discovery in cases pending on July 15, 2008.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 114, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.